Massachusetts, session 194th, H1838.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The commissioner of probation is hereby authorized and directed to include 
any injunction issued, whether a temporary, preliminary, permanent or final injunction, pursuant 
to sections 11H or section 11I of chapter 12, or section 127B of chapter 266, in the statewide 
domestic violence record keeping system created pursuant to St. 1992, c. 188 § 7.  Such 
information shall be made available to judges considering the issuance of any injunction 
pursuant to sections 11H or 12I of chapter 12, or section 127B of chapter 266.  Further, such 
information shall be made available to criminal justice agencies through the criminal justice 
information system maintained by the executive office of public safety. 

of 2 9  SECTION 2.  Section 11H of chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the second sentence the following sentences:— 
Upon issuance of an injunction, whether a final injunctive order, or a temporary, 
preliminary, or permanent injunction, as provided in this section, the clerk shall transmit a 
certified copy of such order to the commissioner of probation for entry into the statewide 
domestic violence record keeping system.  The Attorney General shall transmit to the 
commissioner of probation a certified copy of each order obtained under this section that is in 
effect on the effective date of this amendment, for entry into the statewide domestic violence 
record keeping system. 
SECTION 3.  Section 11I of chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the second sentence the following sentence:— 
Upon issuance of an injunction, whether a final injunctive order, or a temporary, 
preliminary, or permanent injunction, as provided in this section, the clerk shall transmit a 
certified copy of such order to the commissioner of probation for entry into the statewide 
domestic violence record keeping system. 
SECTION 4.  Section 127B of chapter 266 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the last sentence of the first paragraph, the following sentence: Upon issuance of 
an injunction, whether a final injunctive order, or a temporary, preliminary, or permanent 
injunction, as provided in this section, the clerk shall transmit a certified copy of such order to 
the commissioner of probation for entry into the statewide domestic violence record keeping 
system.